North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.

Part 1. Definitions.

§ 130A-290.
Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions shall apply throughout this Article:

“Affiliate” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12b-2 (1 April 1996 Edition).

(1a) “Business entity” has the same meaning as in G.S. 55-1-40(2a).

(1b) “CERCLA/SARA” means the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, Pub. L. No. 96-510, 94 Stat. 2767, 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq., as amended, and the Superfund Amendments and Reauthorization Act of 1986, Pub. L.
No. 99-499, 100 Stat. 1613, as amended.

(1c) “Chemical or portable toilet” means a self-contained mobile toilet facility and holding tank and includes toilet facilities in recreational vehicles.

(1d) “Chlorofluorocarbon refrigerant” means any of the following when used as a liquid heat transfer agent in a mechanical refrigeration system: carbon tetrachloride, chlorofluorocarbons, halons, or methyl chloroform.

“Closure” means the cessation of operation of a solid waste management facility and the act of securing the facility so that it will pose no significant threat to human health or the environment.

(2a) Recodified as subdivision (a)(2d) at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes. See note.

(2b) “Coal combustion residuals” means residuals, including fly ash, bottom ash, boiler slag, mill rejects, and flue gas desulfurization residue produced by a coal-fired generating unit destined for disposal. The term does not include coal combustion
products as defined in

G.S. 130A-309.201(4)

.

(2c) “Coal combustion residuals landfill” means a facility or unit for the disposal of combustion products, where the landfill is located at the same facility with the coal-fired generating unit or units producing the combustion products, and where the
landfill is located wholly or partly on top of a facility that is, or was, being used for the disposal or storage of such combustion products, including, but not limited to, landfills, wet and dry ash ponds, and structural
fill facilities.

(2d) “Coal-fired generating unit” means a coal-fired generating unit, as defined by 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 96.2 (1 July 2001 Edition), that is located in this State and has the capacity to generate 25 or more megawatts of electricity.

“Commercial” when applied to a hazardous waste facility, means a hazardous waste facility that accepts hazardous waste from the general public or from another person for a fee.

(3a) “Commission” means the Environmental Management Commission.

“Construction” or “demolition” when used in connection with “waste” or “debris” means solid waste resulting solely from construction, remodeling, repair, or demolition operations on pavement, buildings, or other structures, but does not include inert
debris, land-clearing debris or yard debris.

(4a) “Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality.

Repealed by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 594, s. 1.

“Disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking or placing of any solid waste into or on any land or water so that the solid waste or any constituent part of the solid waste may enter the environment or be emitted into the
air or discharged into any waters, including groundwaters.

“Garbage” means all putrescible wastes, including animal offal and carcasses, and recognizable industrial by-products, but excluding sewage and human waste.

“Hazardous waste” means a solid waste, or combination of solid wastes, which because of its quantity, concentration or physical, chemical or infectious characteristics may:

Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or

Pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of or otherwise managed.

(8a) “Hazardous waste constituent” has the same meaning as in 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 260.10 (1 July 2006).

“Hazardous waste facility” means a facility for the collection, storage, processing, treatment, recycling, recovery, or disposal of hazardous waste. Hazardous waste facility does not include a hazardous waste transfer facility that meets the requirements
of 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 263.12 (1 July 2006).

“Hazardous waste generation” means the act or process of producing hazardous waste.

“Hazardous waste disposal facility” means any facility or any portion of a facility for disposal of hazardous waste on or in land in accordance with rules adopted under this Article.

“Hazardous waste management” means the systematic control of the collection, source separation, storage, transportation, processing, treatment, recovery and disposal of hazardous wastes.

“Hazardous waste management program” means the program and activities within the Department pursuant to Part 2 of this Article, for hazardous waste management.

(13a) “Hazardous waste transfer facility” means a facility or location where a hazardous waste transporter stores hazardous waste for a period of more than 24 hours but less than 10 days.

(13b) “Industrial solid waste” means solid waste generated by manufacturing or industrial processes that is not hazardous waste.

“Inert debris” means solid waste which consists solely of material that is virtually inert and that is likely to retain its physical and chemical structure under expected conditions of disposal.

“Land-clearing debris” means solid waste which is generated solely from land-clearing activities.

“Landfill” means a disposal facility or part of a disposal facility where waste is placed in or on land and which is not a land treatment facility, a surface impoundment, an injection well, a hazardous waste long-term storage facility or a surface storage
facility.

(16a) “Leachate” means a liquid that has passed through or emerged from solid waste and contains soluble, suspended, or miscible materials removed from such waste. The term “leachate” does not include liquid adhering to tires of vehicles leaving a sanitary
landfill and transfer stations.

“Manifest” means the form used for identifying the quantity, composition and the origin, routing and destination of hazardous waste during its transportation from the point of generation to the point of disposal, treatment or storage.

(17a) “Medical waste” means any solid waste which is generated in the diagnosis, treatment, or immunization of human beings or animals, in research pertaining thereto, or in the production or testing of biologicals, but does not include any hazardous
waste identified or listed pursuant to this Article, radioactive waste, household waste as defined in 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 261.4(b)(1) in effect on 1 July 1989, or those substances excluded from the definition
of “solid waste” in this section.

“Motor vehicle oil filter” means a filter that removes impurities from the oil used to lubricate an internal combustion engine in a motor vehicle.

(18a) “Municipal solid waste” means any solid waste resulting from the operation of residential, commercial, industrial, governmental, or institutional establishments that would normally be collected, processed, and disposed of through a public or private
solid waste management service. Municipal solid waste does not include hazardous waste, sludge, industrial waste managed in a solid waste management facility owned and operated by the generator of the industrial waste
for management of that waste, or solid waste from mining or agricultural operations.

(18b) “Municipal solid waste management facility” means any publicly or privately owned solid waste management facility permitted by the Department that receives municipal solid waste for processing, treatment, or disposal.

“Natural resources” means all materials which have useful physical or chemical properties which exist, unused, in nature.

“Open dump” means any facility or site where solid waste is disposed of that is not a sanitary landfill and that is not a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment or a facility for the disposal of hazardous waste.

“Operator” means any person, including the owner, who is principally engaged in, and is in charge of, the actual operation, supervision, and maintenance of a solid waste management facility and includes the person in charge of a shift or periods of operation
during any part of the day.

(21a) “Parent” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12b-2 (1 April 1996 Edition).

“Person” means an individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, unit of local government, State agency, federal agency or other legal entity.

(22a) “Pre-1983 landfill” means any land area, whether publicly or privately owned, on which municipal solid waste disposal occurred prior to 1 January 1983 but not thereafter, but does not include any landfill used primarily for the disposal of industrial
solid waste.

“Processing” means any technique designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any solid waste so as to render it safe for transport; amenable to recovery, storage or recycling; safe for disposal; or reduced in volume
or concentration.

“Recovered material” means a material that has known recycling potential, can be feasibly recycled, and has been diverted or removed from the solid waste stream for sale, use, or reuse. In order to qualify as a recovered material, a material must meet
the requirements of G.S. 130A-309.05(c).

“RCRA” means the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, Pub. L. 94-580, 90 Stat. 2795, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., as amended.

“Recyclable material” means those materials which are capable of being recycled and which would otherwise be processed or disposed of as solid waste.

“Recycling” means any process by which solid waste, or materials which would otherwise become solid waste, are collected, separated, or processed, and reused or returned to use in the form of raw materials or products.

“Refuse” means all nonputrescible waste.

(28a) “Refuse-derived fuel” means fuel that consists of municipal solid waste from which recyclable and noncombustible materials are removed so that the remaining material is used for energy production.

“Resource recovery” means the process of obtaining material or energy resources from discarded solid waste which no longer has any useful life in its present form and preparing the solid waste for recycling.

“Reuse” means a process by which resources are reused or rendered usable.

“Sanitary landfill” means a facility for disposal of solid waste on land in a sanitary manner in accordance with the rules concerning sanitary landfills adopted under this Article.

(31a) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Environmental Quality.

“Septage” means solid waste that is a fluid mixture of untreated and partially treated sewage solids, liquids, and sludge of human or domestic origin which is removed from a wastewater system. The term septage includes the following:

Domestic septage, which is either liquid or solid material removed from a septic tank, cesspool, portable toilet, Type III marine sanitation device, or similar treatment works receiving only domestic sewage. Domestic septage does not include liquid or
solid material removed from a septic tank, cesspool, or similar treatment works receiving either commercial wastewater or industrial wastewater and does not include grease removed from a grease trap at a restaurant.

Domestic treatment plant septage, which is solid, semisolid, or liquid residue generated during the treatment of domestic sewage in a treatment works where the designed disposal is subsurface. Domestic treatment plant septage includes, but is not limited
to, scum or solids removed in primary, secondary, or advanced wastewater treatment processes and a material derived from domestic treatment plant septage. Domestic treatment plant septage does not include ash generated
during the firing of domestic treatment plant septage in an incinerator or grit and screenings generated during preliminary treatment of domestic sewage in a treatment works.

Grease septage, which is material pumped from grease interceptors, separators, traps, or other appurtenances used for the purpose of removing cooking oils, fats, grease, and food debris from the waste flow generated from food handling, preparation, and
cleanup.

Industrial or commercial septage, which is material pumped from septic tanks or other devices used in the collection, pretreatment, or treatment of any water-carried waste resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business where the
design disposal of the wastewater is subsurface. Domestic septage mixed with any industrial or commercial septage is considered industrial or commercial septage.

Industrial or commercial treatment plant septage, which is solid, semisolid, or liquid residue generated during the treatment of sewage that contains any waste resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business in a treatment works
where the designed disposal is subsurface. Industrial or commercial treatment plant septage includes, but is not limited to, scum or solids removed in primary, secondary, or advanced wastewater treatment processes
and a material derived from domestic treatment plant septage. Industrial or commercial treatment plant septage does not include ash generated during the firing of industrial or commercial treatment plant septage
in an incinerator or grit and screenings generated during preliminary treatment of domestic sewage in a treatment works.

“Septage management firm” means a person engaged in the business of pumping, transporting, storing, treating or disposing septage. The term does not include public or community wastewater systems that treat or dispose septage.

“Sludge” means any solid, semisolid or liquid waste generated from a municipal, commercial, institutional or industrial wastewater treatment plant, water supply treatment plant or air pollution control facility, or any other waste having similar characteristics
and effects.

“Solid waste” means any hazardous or nonhazardous garbage, refuse or sludge from a waste treatment plant, water supply treatment plant or air pollution control facility, domestic sewage and sludges generated by the treatment thereof in sanitary sewage
collection, treatment and disposal systems, and other material that is either discarded or is being accumulated, stored or treated prior to being discarded, or has served its original intended use and is generally discarded,
including solid, liquid, semisolid or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, institutional, commercial and agricultural operations, and from community activities. Notwithstanding sub-sub-subdivision b.3.
of this subdivision, the term includes coal combustion residuals. The term does not include:

Fecal waste from fowls and animals other than humans.

Solid or dissolved material in:

Domestic sewage and sludges generated by treatment thereof in sanitary sewage collection, treatment and disposal systems which are designed to discharge effluents to the surface waters.

Irrigation return flows.

Wastewater discharges and the sludges incidental to and generated by treatment which are point sources subject to permits granted under Section 402 of the Water Pollution Control Act, as amended (P.L. 92-500), and permits granted under

G.S. 143-215.1

by the Commission, including coal combustion products. However, any sludges that meet the criteria for hazardous waste under RCRA shall also be a solid waste for the purposes of this
Article.

Oils and other liquid hydrocarbons controlled under Article 21A of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes. However, any oils or other liquid hydrocarbons that meet the criteria for hazardous waste under RCRA shall also be a solid waste for the purposes of
this Article.

Any source, special nuclear or byproduct material as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 2011).

Mining refuse covered by the North Carolina Mining Act,

G.S. 74-46

through 74-68 and regulated by the North Carolina Mining Commission (as defined under

G.S. 143B-293.1

). However, any specific mining waste that meets the criteria for hazardous waste under RCRA shall also be a solid waste for the purposes of this Article.

Recovered material.

Steel slag that is a product of the electric arc furnace steelmaking process; provided, that such steel slag is sold and distributed in the stream of commerce for consumption, use, or further processing into another desired commodity and is managed as
an item of commercial value in a controlled manner and not as a discarded material or in a manner constituting disposal.

“Solid waste disposal site” means any place at which solid wastes are disposed of by incineration, sanitary landfill or any other method.

“Solid waste generation” means the act or process of producing solid waste.

“Solid waste management” means purposeful, systematic control of the generation, storage, collection, transport, separation, treatment, processing, recycling, recovery and disposal of solid waste.

“Solid waste management facility” means land, personnel and equipment used in the management of solid waste.

“Special wastes” means solid wastes that can require special handling and management, including white goods, whole tires, used oil, lead-acid batteries, and medical wastes.

“Storage” means the containment of solid waste, either on a temporary basis or for a period of years, in a manner which does not constitute disposal.

(41a) “Subsidiary” has the same meaning as in 17 Code of Federal Regulations § 240.12b-2 (1 April 1996 Edition).

(41b) “Tire-derived fuel” means a form of fuel derived from scrap tires.

“Treatment” means any method, technique or process, including neutralization, designed to change the physical, chemical or biological character or composition of any hazardous waste so as to neutralize such waste or so as to render such waste nonhazardous,
safer for transport, amenable for recovery, amenable for storage or reduced in volume. “Treatment” includes any activity or processing designed to change the physical form or chemical composition of hazardous waste so as
to render it nonhazardous.

“Unit of local government” means a county, city, town or incorporated village.

“White goods” includes refrigerators, ranges, water heaters, freezers, unit air conditioners, washing machines, dishwashers, clothes dryers, and other similar domestic and commercial large appliances.

(44a) “Wooden pallet” means a wooden object consisting of a flat or horizontal deck or platform supported by structural components that is used as a base for assembling, stacking, handling, and transporting goods.

“Yard trash” means solid waste consisting solely of vegetative matter resulting from landscaping maintenance.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions shall apply throughout

G.S. 130A-309.15

through

G.S. 130A-309.24

:

“Public used oil collection center” means:

Automotive service facilities or governmentally sponsored collection facilities, which in the course of business accept for disposal small quantities of used oil from households; and

Facilities which store used oil in aboveground tanks, which are approved by the Department, and which in the course of business accept for disposal small quantities of used oil from households.

“Reclaiming” means the use of methods, other than those used in rerefining, to purify used oil primarily to remove insoluble contaminants, making the oil suitable for further use; the methods may include settling, heating, dehydration, filtration, or
centrifuging.

“Recycling” means to prepare used oil for reuse as a petroleum product by rerefining, reclaiming, reprocessing, or other means or to use used oil in a manner that substitutes for a petroleum product made from new oil.

“Rerefining” means the use of refining processes on used oil to produce high-quality base stocks for lubricants or other petroleum products. Rerefining may include distillation, hydrotreating, or treatments employing acid, caustic, solvent, clay, or other
chemicals, or other physical treatments other than those used in reclaiming.

“Used oil” means any oil which has been refined from crude oil or synthetic oil and, as a result of use, storage, or handling, has become unsuitable for its original purpose due to the presence of impurities or loss of original properties, but which may
be suitable for further use and is economically recyclable.

“Used oil recycling facility” means any facility that recycles more than 10,000 gallons of used oil annually.

History.
1969, c. 899; 1975, c. 311, s. 2; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1979, c. 464, s. 1; 1981, c. 704, s. 4; 1983, c. 795, ss. 1, 8.1; c. 891, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 973, s. 2; 1985, c. 738, s. 1; 1987, c. 574, s. 1; 1987
(Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1020, s. 1; c. 1058, s. 1; 1989, c. 168, s. 11; c. 742, s. 5; c. 784, s. 1; 1991, c. 342, s. 7; c. 621, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1013, s. 7; 1993, c. 173, ss. 1-3; c. 471, ss. 1, 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess.,
1996), c. 594, ss. 1-5; 1997-27, s. 1; 1997-330, s. 3; 1997-443, s. 11A.81; 2005-362, s. 1; 2007-107, ss. 1.1(c), 1.8(a), (b); 2007-550, ss. 7(a), 12(a), (b); 2012-143, s. 1(d); 2013-413, s. 59.3; 2014-4, s. 5(c); 2014-115, s. 17;
2014-122, s. 3(d); 2015-1, s. 2(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), (v).

Cross References.

As to provisions for regional solid waste management authorities, see Article 22 of Chapter 153A,

G.S. 153A-421

et seq.

§ 130A-291.
Division of Waste Management.

For the purpose of promoting and preserving an environment that is conducive to public health and welfare, and preventing the creation of nuisances and the depletion of our natural resources, the Department shall maintain a Division of Waste Management
to promote sanitary processing, treatment, disposal, and statewide management of solid waste and the greatest possible recycling and recovery of resources, and the Department shall employ and retain qualified personnel as may be
necessary to effect such purposes. It is the purpose and intent of the State to be and remain cognizant not only of its responsibility to authorize and establish a statewide solid waste management program, but also of its responsibility
to monitor and supervise, through the Department, the activities and operations of units of local government implementing a permitted solid waste management facility serving a specified geographic area in accordance with a solid
waste management plan.

In furtherance of this purpose and intent, it is hereby determined and declared that it is necessary for the health and welfare of the inhabitants of the State that solid waste management facilities permitted hereunder and serving a specified geographic
area shall be used by public or private owners or occupants of all lands, buildings, and premises within the geographic area. Actions taken pursuant to this Article shall be deemed to be acts of the sovereign power of the State
of North Carolina, and to the extent reasonably necessary to achieve the purposes of this section, a unit of local government may displace competition with public service for solid waste management and disposal. It is further determined
and declared that no person, firm, corporation, association or entity within the geographic area shall engage in any activities which would be competitive with this purpose or with ordinances, rules adopted pursuant to the authority
granted herein.

Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, a unit of local government may, by ordinance, franchise, business license, contract, or otherwise, require that all solid waste generated within the geographic area and placed in the waste
stream for disposal be delivered to the permitted solid waste management facility or facilities serving the geographic area only under one of the following conditions:

If the unit of local government has debt associated with solid waste management facilities and equipment outstanding on September 1, 2017, the unit of local government may adopt and enforce such an ordinance until the date that such debt has matured.

If the unit of local government incurs debt after September 1, 2017, and the issuance of the debt will be conditioned upon the unit of local government requiring that all waste collected within the county be disposed of within the landfill, for expansion
of a landfill or construction of a new landfill after all necessary approvals for issuance of the debt have been obtained from the Local Government Commission in compliance with Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, including
the demonstration of need and cost required by

G.S. 159-216

, the unit of local government may adopt and enforce such an ordinance until the date the debt associated with expansion of the landfill, or construction of the new landfill, has matured.

If the unit of local government is a party to an exclusive franchise agreement with a private entity governing the management or disposal of waste within the jurisdiction in effect on September 1, 2017, the unit of local government may adopt and enforce
such an ordinance until the date that such franchise has expired.

Expired June 30, 2019, pursuant to Session Laws 2018-114, s. 20(b).

Notwithstanding any limitations set forth in subsection (c) of this section, and except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a regional solid waste management authority established under Article 22 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes, and
a unit of local government that is a member of an authority, may, by ordinance, require that all solid waste generated within its jurisdiction and placed in the waste stream for disposal be delivered to the permitted solid waste
management facility or facilities operated by the regional solid waste management authority.

Notwithstanding authority given to local governments to manage solid waste generated or disposed of within their jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (c) or (d) of this section, or otherwise, units of local government shall not, by ordinance or otherwise,
prohibit the disposal of construction and demolition debris in any sanitary landfill permitted for the disposal of construction and demolition debris, which landfill has a valid and operative franchise agreement and is otherwise
properly permitted pursuant to

G.S. 130A-294

.

History.
1969, c. 899; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; 1975, c. 311, s. 3; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1216; 1983, c. 795, ss. 2, 8.1; c. 891, s. 2; 1987, c. 574, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 144; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1004, ss. 7, 8; 1995 (Reg. Sess.,
1996), c. 743, s. 4; 2017-209, s. 17(a); 2018-114, s. 20(a); 2020-3, s. 4.30(i).

§ 130A-291.1.
Septage management program; permit fees.

The Department shall establish and administer a septage management program in accordance with the provisions of this section.

For the protection of the public health, the Commission shall adopt rules governing the management of septage. The rules shall include, but are not limited to, criteria for the sanitary management of septage, including standards for the transportation,
storage, treatment, and disposal of septage; operator registration and training; the issuance, suspension, and revocation of permits; and procedures for the payment of annual fees.

No septage management firm shall commence or continue operation that does not have a permit issued by the Department. The permit shall be issued only when the septage management firm satisfies all of the requirements of the rules adopted by the Commission.
Within 90 days of receiving a complete permit application, the Department shall grant or deny the permit in accordance with G.S. 130A-294(a)(4). A septage management firm that commences operation without first having obtained a
permit shall cease to operate until the firm obtains a permit under this section and shall pay an initial annual fee equal to twice the amount of the annual fee that would otherwise be applicable under subsection (e) of this section.

Septage shall be treated and disposed only at a wastewater system that has been approved by the Department under rules adopted by the Commission or at a site that is permitted by the Department under this section. A permit shall be issued only if the
site satisfies all of the requirements of the rules adopted by the Commission.

A septage management firm that operates one pumper truck shall pay an annual fee of five hundred fifty dollars ($550.00) to the Department. A septage management firm that operates two or more pumper trucks shall pay an annual fee of eight hundred dollars
($800.00) to the Department.

(e1) An individual who operates a septage treatment or disposal facility but who does not engage in the business of pumping, transporting, or disposing of septage shall pay an annual fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00).

(e2) A properly completed application for a permit and the annual fee under this section are due by December 15 of each year. The Department shall mail a notice of the annual fees to each permitted septage management firm and each individual who operates
a septage treatment or disposal facility prior to October 1 of each calendar year. A late fee in the amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the annual permit fee under this section shall be submitted when a properly completed
application and annual permit fee are not submitted by January 1 following the October 1 notice. The clear proceeds of civil penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture
Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

(e3) The Septage Management Account is established as a nonreverting account within the Department. Fees collected under this section shall be placed in the Septage Management Account and shall be applied only to the costs of the septage management program.

(e4) Permits for new septage management firm operators and permits for septage management firm operators that have not operated a septage management firm in the 24 months immediately preceding the submittal of an application shall be considered probationary
for 12 months. The Department may revoke any probationary permit of a firm or an individual that violates any provision of this section,

G.S. 130A-291.2

,

G.S. 130A-291.3

, or any rule adopted under these sections. If the Department revokes a probationary permit issued to a firm or individual, the Department shall not issue another permit to that firm or individual, and the firm
or individual may not engage in any septage management activity for a period of 12 months. In the event of a change in ownership or corporate structure, the permit shall be amended to reflect the change in ownership, corporate
structure, and contact information upon Department approval of the application for permit amendment.

(e5) The Department shall provide technical and regulatory assistance to permit applicants and permit holders. Assistance may include, but is not limited to, taking soil samples on proposed and permitted septage land application sites and providing required
training to permit applicants and permit holders.

All wastewater systems designed to discharge effluent to the surface waters may accept, treat, and dispose septage from permitted septage management firms, unless acceptance of the septage would constitute a violation of the permit conditions of the wastewater
system. The wastewater system may charge a reasonable fee for acceptance, treatment, and disposal of septage based on a fee schedule that takes into account septage composition and quantity and that is consistent with other charges
for use of that system.

Production of a crop in accordance with an approved nutrient management plan on land that is permitted as a septage land application site is a bona fide farm purpose under G.S. 153A-340.

The Department shall inspect each septage land application site at least twice a year and shall inspect the records associated with each septage land application site at least annually. The Department shall inspect each pumper truck used for septage management
at least once every two years.

(h1)
The annual permit application shall identify the pumper trucks and vehicles to be used by the septage management firm. Pumper trucks and vehicles used in the transportation, containment, or consolidation of liquid
septage shall be listed by the septage management firm on its permit and inspected and regulated as vehicles by the Department but shall not be regulated as septage detention facilities. Equipment used in the containment and
consolidation of septage shall be regulated as septage detention or treatment sites and require a permit. All pumper trucks and vehicles used by a permitted septage management firm shall meet all federal and State highway laws
or have a maximum capacity of no more than 21,000 gallons. A permitted septage management firm shall notify the Department within 10 days of placing a pumper truck or vehicle in service that was not previously included in a
permit issued to the firm and shall make the pumper truck or vehicle available for inspection by the Department. A septage management firm is not prohibited from use of a pumper truck or vehicle that meets the requirements
of the rules adopted by the Commission prior to inspection by the Department. All pumper trucks and vehicles that are listed on the approved septage management firm’s permit may remain loaded or partially loaded for no more
than seven days. All pumper trucks and vehicles used in the transportation, containment, or consolidation of septage that are listed on the approved septage management firm’s permit shall be located on the premises of a septage
management facility or on the property of another party by legal agreement of the septage management firm and the property owner.

The Department shall approve innovative or alternative septage treatment or storage methods that are demonstrated to protect the public health and the environment.

Septage generated by the operation of a wastewater system permitted under Article 11 of this Chapter may be managed as provided in this section and may be land applied at a septage land application site permitted under this section.

History.
1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1058, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 8; 1993, c. 173, s. 4; 2001-505, s. 1.1; 2005-276, s. 6.37(t); 2006-255, s. 5.1(a); 2012-200, s. 15; 2014-122, s. 11(b); 2020-78, s. 7.1; 2021-83,
s. 1.

§ 130A-291.2.
Temporary domestic wastewater holding tanks.

When a permanent domestic wastewater collection and treatment system is not available at a construction site or a temporary special event, a temporary wastewater holding tank of adequate capacity to prevent overflow may be used under a mobile or modular
office to accommodate domestic wastewater from a commode and sink. The wastewater shall be removed often enough to prevent the temporary domestic wastewater holding tank from overflowing. The owner or lessee of a temporary construction
trailer shall contract with a registered septage management firm or registered portable toilet sanitation firm for the removal of domestic waste. The wastewater shall be removed from the temporary domestic wastewater holding tank by
a septage management firm holding a current permit to operate a septage firm.

History.
2001-505, s. 1.2.

§ 130A-291.3.
Septage operator training required.

Each septage management firm operator shall attend a training course approved pursuant to subsection (d) of this section of no less than four hours of instruction per year. New septage management firm operators and those that have not operated a septage
management firm in the 24 months preceding the submittal of an application shall complete the training before commencing operation.

Each septage land application site operator shall attend a training course approved pursuant to subsection (d) of this section of no less than three hours of instruction per year. New septage land application site operators and those that have not operated
a septage land application site in the 24 months preceding the submittal of an application shall complete the training before commencing operation. The Department shall notify all septage management firm operators of changes to
rules no later than 30 days after those changes have been adopted by the Commission and shall post all septage management program rules to its website.

Upon the completion of the permit requirements under

G.S. 130A-291.1

and the training requirements under this section, the Department shall issue the septage management firm a certificate to operate as a registered portable sanitation firm or a registered septage management firm,
or both.

The Department shall develop and maintain a list of approved instruction courses that have a direct or indirect relevance to septage management firms, septage land application site operators, and septage detention or treatment facility operators. The
instruction courses shall be technical in nature and address business management practices, professional ethics, quality assurance, codes, or similar topics which facilitate professional development and serve to safeguard health,
safety, and welfare of citizens. The Department may approve additional training courses on a case-by-case basis.

History.
2001-505, s. 1.2; 2021-83, s. 2.